North Dakota, session 69, HB1072.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 50-11-03.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
50-11-03.2. Use of public funds.
1. Public funds for the purchase of foster care for children or adults may be used only in facilities
licensed, certified, or approved by the department. No person acting on behalf of any state,
county, or local governmental entity may arrange for or promote care provided in a facility that
does not have a license, certification, or approval issued by the department. This section does
not apply to any home or institution under the management and control of the state.
2. Nonfederal funds may be used to reimburse the costs of shelter care placements for no more
than seven days if the shelter care services are certified by the department. If the entity has
diligently pursued other placement, the department may grant an extension for the health and
safety of the child or due to unforeseeable circumstances.
3. Nonfederal funds may be used for maintenance payments to an unlicensed identified
relativesrelative or unlicensed kinship relativesrelative for no more than six months and to a
guardian with a subsidy approval made by the department.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 50-11-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
50-11-07. Denial or revocation of license or certification.
The department may deny or revoke the license or certification of any facility upon proper showing
of any of the following:
1. Any of the conditions set forth in section 50-11-02 as prerequisites for the issuance of the
license or certification do not exist.
2. The application contains false or misleading material information or the applicant intentionally
withheld material information.
3. The license or certification was issued upon false, misleading, or intentionally withheld
material information.
4. An operator, licensee, certification holder, caregiver, employee, or an agent of the facility has
violated a provision of this chapter or any of the rules of the department.
5. An applicant, licensee, or certification holder providing family foster care for children has been
involved in a court action in which a child in their household is currently or within the last five
years has been removed from the home due to a contrary to the welfare findingsfinding issued
by a court.

H. B. NO. 1072 - PAGE 2
6. An operator, applicant, licensee, certification holder, caregiver, employee, or agent of the
facility has been convicted of an offense determined by the department to have a direct
bearing upon the person's ability to serve the public or residents of the facility, or the
department determines, following conviction of any other offense, the person is not sufficiently
rehabilitated under section 12.1-33-02.1.

H. B. NO. 1072 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1072.
House Vote: Yeas 92 Nays 0 Absent 2
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State